Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 3. Salmon Fishery Assessment.

Sec. 43.76.220.
Salmon fishery assessment.

A salmon fishery assessment shall be levied on the value of the salmon sold in a salmon fishery. The rate of the assessment, not to exceed five percent, and the termination date of the assessment shall be determined by an election under AS

43.76.230

.

A salmon fishery assessment may only be levied or collected on salmon sold in a fishery if

there exists for that fishery an association determined by the commissioner of fish and game to be a qualified salmon fishery association under AS

16.40.250

; and

the rate of the salmon fishery assessment is determined by an election under AS

43.76.230

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 134 SLA 2002)

Sec. 43.76.230.
Election to approve, amend, or terminate salmon fishery assessment.

A qualified salmon fishery association may conduct an election under this section after the commissioner of fish and game approves

the notice to be published by the qualified salmon fishery association; the notice must state that all salmon sold in the fishery are subject to the salmon fishery assessment, the rate of the salmon fishery assessment to be approved, amended, or terminated at the election, and the date on which the assessment would terminate under AS

43.76.250(a)

;

the ballot to be used in the election; and

the registration and voting procedure for the approval, amendment, or termination of the salmon fishery assessment.

The salmon fishery assessment is levied under AS

43.76.220

in a fishery on the effective date stated on the ballot if

the assessment is approved by a two-thirds majority vote of the eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holders in the fishery; and

the election results are certified by the commissioner of fish and game.

In conducting an election under this section, a qualified salmon fishery association shall adopt the following procedures:

the qualified salmon fishery association for the fishery shall make copies of the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the association available to all interim-use permit and entry permit holders in the fishery;

the qualified salmon fishery association for the fishery shall hold at least one public meeting not less than 30 days before the date on which ballots must be postmarked to be counted in the election to explain, as appropriate, the reason for approval or amendment of the proposed salmon fishery assessment, the reason for the proposed rate and the proposed termination date of the salmon fishery assessment, or the reason for termination of the salmon fishery assessment, and to explain the registration and voting procedure to be used in the election; the qualified salmon fishery association shall provide notice of the meeting by

mailing the notice to each eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holder;

posting the notice in at least three public places in the administrative area in which the fishery occurs; and

publishing the notice in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the administrative area in which the fishery occurs at least once a week for two consecutive weeks before the meeting;

the qualified salmon fishery association shall mail two ballots to each eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holder; the first ballot shall be mailed not more than 45 days before the date ballots must be postmarked to be counted in the election; the second ballot shall be mailed not less than 15 days before the date ballots must be postmarked to be counted in the election; the qualified salmon fishery association shall adopt procedures to ensure that only one ballot from each eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holder is counted in the election;

the ballot must

state that all salmon sold in the fishery are subject to the salmon fishery assessment;

state the rate of the assessment to be levied under AS

43.76.220

and the date on which the assessment would terminate under AS

43.76.250(a)

;

ask the question whether the salmon fishery assessment addressed on the ballot shall be approved, amended, or terminated, as appropriate;

indicate the fishery for which the salmon fishery assessment will be levied or terminated;

provide an effective date for the approval, amendment, or termination of the salmon fishery assessment; and

indicate the date on which returned ballots must be postmarked in order to be counted;

the ballots shall be returned by mail and shall be counted by an auditor selected by the qualified salmon fishery association and approved by the commissioner of fish and game; the qualified salmon fishery association shall pay the costs of counting the ballots.

The commissioner of fish and game shall certify the results of an election under this section if the commissioner determines that the requirements of (a) and (c) of this section have been satisfied.

A qualified salmon fishery association may employ or contract with another person to administer an election under this section subject to the supervision of the association.

Except as otherwise provided under AS

43.76.240

and

43.76.250

, an election to amend the rate or termination date of a salmon fishery assessment or to terminate a salmon fishery assessment shall be conducted under the same procedures established under (a), (c), and (d) of this section for an election to approve a salmon fishery assessment.

In this section, “eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holder” means an individual who, 90 days before the date ballots must be postmarked to be counted in an election under this section, is listed in the records of the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission as the legal holder of an interim-use permit for salmon fishing gear or an entry permit for salmon fishing gear that authorizes the individual to fish commercially in the salmon fishery for which the salmon fishery assessment is to be approved, amended, or terminated.

History.

(§ 4 ch 134 SLA 2002)

Sec. 43.76.240.
Amendment of salmon fishery assessment.

The rate or termination date of the salmon fishery assessment levied on salmon under AS

43.76.220

may be amended by the commissioner of revenue upon a two-thirds majority vote at an election held under AS

43.76.230

among the eligible permit holders for the fishery in which the salmon fishery assessment is levied.

The commissioner of revenue shall amend the rate or termination date of a salmon fishery assessment under (a) of this section following an election among the eligible permit holders for the fishery if

a petition that is signed by at least 25 percent of the interim-use permit and entry permit holders in the fishery that is the subject of the petition is presented to the commissioner of fish and game requesting amendment of the rate or termination date of the salmon fishery assessment; the petition must state, as appropriate, the proposed rate or termination date of the salmon fishery assessment to be levied under AS

43.76.220

; only a person who holds an interim-use permit or entry permit for the fishery at the time of signing the petition may validly sign the petition;

an election is held in accordance with AS

43.76.230

; a ballot to amend the rate of the salmon fishery assessment must ask the question whether the rate of the salmon fishery assessment on salmon sold in the fishery shall be amended and must state the salmon fishery assessment to be levied under AS

43.76.220

and the termination date of the assessment if the assessment is amended; a ballot to amend the termination date of the salmon fishery assessment must ask the question whether the termination date of the salmon fishery assessment on salmon sold in the fishery shall be amended and must state the termination date of the salmon fishery assessment if the termination date is amended; the ballot must be worded so that a “yes” vote is for amendment of the salmon fishery assessment and a “no” vote is for continuation of the current salmon fishery assessment;

a two-thirds majority of the eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holders in the fishery casts a ballot for the amendment of the salmon fishery assessment; in this paragraph, “eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holder” has the meaning given in AS

43.76.230

; and

the qualified salmon fishery association provides notice of the election in accordance with AS 43.76.230 within six months after receiving notice from the commissioner of fish and game that a valid petition under (1) of this subsection has been received.

History.

(§ 4 ch 134 SLA 2002)

Sec. 43.76.250.
Termination of salmon fishery assessment.

The salmon fishery assessment levied under AS

43.76.220

shall be terminated by the commissioner of revenue on the termination date determined at an election held under AS

43.76.230

to establish or amend the assessment.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the commissioner of revenue shall terminate the salmon fishery assessment before the termination date determined at an election held under AS

43.76.230

to establish or amend the assessment, upon a two-thirds majority vote at an election held under AS

43.76.230

among the eligible permit holders for the fishery in which the salmon fishery assessment is levied.

The commissioner of revenue shall terminate a salmon fishery assessment under (b) of this section following an election among the eligible permit holders for the fishery if

a petition that is signed by at least 25 percent of the interim-use permit and entry permit holders in the fishery that is the subject of the petition is presented to the commissioner of fish and game requesting termination of the salmon fishery assessment; only a person who holds an interim-use permit or entry permit for the fishery at the time of signing the petition may validly sign the petition;

an election is held in accordance with AS

43.76.230

; the ballot must ask the question whether the salmon fishery assessment shall be terminated; the ballot must be worded so that a “yes” vote is for continuation of the salmon fishery assessment and a “no” vote is for termination of the salmon fishery assessment;

a two-thirds majority of the eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holders in the fishery casts a ballot for the termination of the salmon fishery assessment; in this paragraph, “eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holder” has the meaning given in AS

43.76.230

; and

the qualified salmon fishery association provides notice of the election in accordance with AS 43.76.230 within six months after receiving notice from the commissioner of fish and game that a valid petition under (1) of this subsection has been received.

History.

(§ 4 ch 134 SLA 2002)

Sec. 43.76.260.
Collection of assessment.

Except as otherwise provided under (f) of this section, a buyer who acquires salmon that is subject to a salmon fishery assessment levied under AS

43.76.220

shall collect the salmon fishery assessment at the time of purchase and shall remit the total salmon fishery assessment collected during each month to the Department of Revenue by the last day of the next month.

A buyer who collects the salmon fishery assessment shall maintain records of the value of salmon that is subject to the assessment that is purchased in each salmon fishery of the state.

The owner of salmon removed from the state is liable for payment of the salmon fishery assessment levied under AS

43.76.220

if, at the time the salmon is removed from the state, the assessment payable on the salmon has not been collected by a buyer. If the owner of the salmon is liable for payment of the salmon fishery assessment under this subsection, the owner shall comply with the requirements under (a) and (b) of this section to remit the assessment to the department and to maintain records.

The salmon fishery assessment collected under this section shall be deposited in the state treasury.

The provisions of AS 43.05 and AS 43.10 apply to the enforcement and collection of a salmon fishery assessment levied under AS

43.76.220

—

43.76.280

.

A direct marketing fisheries business licensed under AS

43.75.020(c)

or a commercial fisherman who transfers possession of salmon to a buyer who is not a fisheries business licensed under AS 43.75 is liable for the payment of a salmon fishery assessment levied under AS

43.76.220

if, at the time possession of the fishery resource is transferred to a buyer, the salmon fishery assessment payable on the salmon has not been collected. If a direct marketing fisheries business or commercial fisherman is liable for payment of the salmon fishery assessment under this subsection, the direct marketing fisheries business or commercial fisherman shall comply with the requirement under (b) of this section to maintain records. Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a person subject to this subsection shall remit the total salmon fishery assessment payable during the calendar year to the Department of Revenue before April 1 after close of the calendar year.

History.

(§ 4 ch 134 SLA 2002; am §§ 12, 13 ch 147 SLA 2004)

Sec. 43.76.270.
Funding for qualified salmon fishery associations.

The legislature may make appropriations of revenue collected under AS

43.76.260

to the Department of Fish and Game for funding of the qualified salmon fishery association for the fishery in which the assessment was collected. Funds received under this section by a qualified salmon fishery association may be expended in accordance with the annual operating plan developed under (b) of this section.

The Department of Fish and Game may assist a salmon fishery association in developing an annual operating plan. The annual operating plan must describe the activities for which the association intends to expend the funding received under this section, including consolidation of the fishing fleet in the salmon fishery, financial assistance to permit holders in the fishery to promote consolidation of the fishing fleet for the fishery, and administrative activities of the association.

A qualified salmon fishery association receiving funding under this section shall submit an annual report to the Department of Fish and Game and to the members of the association describing the activities of the association and how those activities are consistent with the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the association.

This section does not establish a dedication of a state tax or license.

This section does not restrict or qualify the authority of the Department of Fish and Game or the Board of Fisheries under AS 16.

History.

(§ 4 ch 134 SLA 2002)

Sec. 43.76.280.
Definitions.

In AS

43.76.220

—

43.76.280

,

“administrative area” means an area established by the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission under AS

16.43.200

for regulating and controlling entry into salmon fisheries;

“buyer” has the meaning given in AS

43.76.040

;

“fishery” has the meaning given in AS

16.43.990

;

“qualified salmon fishery association” means an association that is qualified under AS

16.40.250

;

“salmon” means salmon sold under the authority of a limited entry permit or interim-use permit issued under AS 16.43 for salmon;

“sold” means the transfer of ownership of salmon from an interim-use permit or entry permit holder to a buyer at the first point of sale;

“value” has the meaning given in AS

43.75.290

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 134 SLA 2002)